and.lexd
PATTERNS
NounAbs [<n>:] Abs (Com)
NounObl [<n>:] [<obl>:] (NounInfl) | (NounInflEssive Elative?)

LEXICON NounAbs
берка # змея
цIцIон # соль

LEXICON NounObl
берка:берку # змея
цIцIон:цIцIон # соль

LEXICON Abs
<abs>:

LEXICON NounInfl
<erg>:ди
<ins>:хъи
<sub><lative>:лIи
<super><lative>:ъо

LEXICON NounInflEssive
<super><essive>:ъа
<sub><essive>:лIи

LEXICON Elative
<elative>:кку

LEXICON Com
<com>:{л}ой
